New Jersey, session 221, S2322.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 5 of P.L.1977, c.456 (C.10:5-29.3) is amended to read as follows: 5.    [A service or guide dog trainer] Every person, while engaged in the actual training process and activities of service dogs or guide dogs, shall have the same rights and privileges with respect to access to public facilities, and the same responsibilities as are applicable to a person with a disability if: a.     the service or guide dog is wearing a collar, leash, or other appropriate apparel or device that identifies the dog as participating in a training program with an accredited program for service or guide dogs; and b.    the service or guide dog is being held on a leash, and is under the control of the person raising the dog for an accredited training program; and c.     the person has in his possession, and available for inspection, credentials from an accredited program identifying him as a participant in a service or guide dog training program. (cf: P.L.2003, c.180, s.21) 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month following enactment.